Connecticut, session 2026, HB05572.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any provision
of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Transportation shall convey
to the town of Woodbury a parcel of land located in the town of
Woodbury, at a cost equal to the administrative costs of making such
conveyance. Said parcel of land (1) has an area of approximately 1 acre,
(2) is identified as the portion of a state highway right-of-way located
on the easterly side of Route 6 between Hollow Road to the south and
Dolittle Hill Road to the north, which portion is known as the town's
South Green, and (3) contains memorial veterans monuments and a
paved roadway known as Veterans Lane. The precise size and area of
the parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the Commissioner of
Transportation. The conveyance shall be subject to the approval of the
State Properties Review Board.
(b) The town of Woodbury shall use said parcel of land for purposes
of a commemorative memorial green. If the town of Woodbury:
(1) Does not use said parcel for said purposes;
(2) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel; or

House Bill No. 5572
(3) Leases all or any portion of said parcel,
the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Transportation.
The land shall remain under the care and control of said department
until a conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this
section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section, which deed
or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of
subsection (b) of this section. The Commissioner of Transportation shall
have the sole responsibility for all other incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-14 2 of 2